Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.198

Working in gambling activity without license as violation—Penalty.

Any person who works as an employee or agent or in a similar capacity for another person in connection with the operation of an activity for which a license is required under this chapter or by commission rule without having obtained the applicable license required by the commission under RCW 9.46.070(17) shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction, be punished by up to three hundred sixty-four days in the county jail or a fine of not more than five thousand dollars, or both.

[ 2011 c 96 s 7; 1999 c 143 s 7; 1977 ex.s. c 326 s 14.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2011 c 96: See note following RCW 9A.20.021.